Montana, session 2025, HB353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Class F-1--resident shed collecting license. (1) A resident as defined
in 87-2-102, on payment of a $10 fee, is entitled to receive a Class F-1 license that, except as provided in
subsection (2), authorizes the holder of the license to collect and possess naturally shed antlers and horns of
elk, deer, and antelope and the antlers or horns of a game animal, except for mountain sheep as provided in
87-3-315, with a skull or a portion of a skull attached that has died from natural causes and that has not been
unlawfully killed, captured, or taken or accidentally killed as prescribed by rules of the department.
(2) A license is not required by a landowner, their immediate family, or the landowner's employees
on the landowner's land for the collecting of naturally shed antlers and horns of elk, deer, and antelope or the
antlers or horns of a game animal, except for mountain sheep as provided in 87-3-315, with a skull or a portion
of a skull attached that has died from natural causes and that has not been unlawfully killed, captured, or taken
or accidentally killed.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Class F-2--nonresident shed collecting license. (1) A person who is
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
not a resident as defined in 87-2-102, on payment of a $50 fee, is entitled to receive a Class F-2 license that,
except as provided in subsection (2), authorizes the holder of the license to collect and possess naturally shed
antlers and horns of elk, deer, and antelope and the antlers or horns of a game animal, except for mountain
sheep as provided in 87-3-315, with a skull or a portion of a skull attached that has died from natural causes
and that has not been unlawfully killed, captured, or taken or accidentally killed as prescribed by rules of the
department.
(2) A license is not required by a landowner, their immediate family, or the landowner's employees
on the landowner's land for the collecting of naturally shed antlers and horns of elk, deer, and antelope or the
antlers or horns of a game animal, except for mountain sheep as provided in 87-3-315, with a skull or a portion
of a skull attached that has died from natural causes and that has not been unlawfully killed, captured, or taken
or accidentally killed.

Section 3. Section 87-1-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-1-201. Powers and duties. (1) Except as provided in subsection (13), the department shall
supervise all the wildlife, fish, game, game and nongame birds, waterfowl, and the game and fur-bearing
animals of the state and may implement voluntary programs that encourage hunting access on private lands
and that promote harmonious relations between landowners and the hunting public. The department possesses
all powers necessary to fulfill the duties prescribed by law and to bring actions in the proper courts of this state
for the enforcement of the fish and game laws and the rules adopted by the department.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (13), the department shall enforce all the laws of the state
regarding the protection, preservation, management, and propagation of fish, game, fur-bearing animals, and
game and nongame birds within the state.
(3) The department has the exclusive power to spend for the protection, preservation,
management, and propagation of fish, game, fur-bearing animals, and game and nongame birds all state funds
collected or acquired for that purpose, whether arising from state appropriation, licenses, fines, gifts, or
otherwise. Money collected or received from the sale of hunting and fishing licenses or permits, from the sale of
seized game or hides, from fines or damages collected for violations of the fish and game laws, or from
appropriations or received by the department from any other sources is under the control of the department and
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
is available for appropriation to the department.
(4) The department may discharge any appointee or employee of the department for cause at any
time.
(5) The department may dispose of all property owned by the state used for the protection,
preservation, management, and propagation of fish, game, fur-bearing animals, and game and nongame birds
that is of no further value or use to the state and shall turn over the proceeds from the sale to the state
treasurer to be credited to the fish and game account in the state special revenue fund.
(6) (a) The department may not issue firearms within this state to anyone except:
(i) wardens; and
(ii) other qualified employees identified, trained, and certified by the department where necessary
to perform assigned duties pursuant to subsection (7).
(b) Wardens, as authorized officers under 87-1-502, are the only department employees with the
authority to enforce provisions of state law or administrative rule.
(7) (a) Department employees may be issued a firearm as allowed in subsection (6)(a)(ii) only after
submitting a form of final approval as determined and approved by the department.
(b) Department-issued firearms may be carried by an employee other than a warden only when the
employee is engaged in work that requires the carrying of a firearm, as determined by the department.
(c) When a department-issued firearm is no longer necessary to perform an employee's required
duties, the employee shall return the issued firearm to secure storage in the regional office to which the
employee is attached.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (13), the department is authorized to make, promulgate, and
enforce reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of Title 87, chapter 2, that in its
judgment will accomplish the purpose of chapter 2.
(9) The department is authorized to promulgate rules relative to tagging, possession, or
transportation of bear within or outside of the state.
(10) (a) The department shall implement programs that:
(i) manage wildlife, fish, game, and nongame animals in a manner that prevents the need for
listing under 87-5-107 or under the federal Endangered Species Act, 16 U.S.C. 1531, et seq.;
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
(ii) manage listed species, sensitive species, or a species that is a potential candidate for listing
under 87-5-107 or under the federal Endangered Species Act, 16 U.S.C. 1531, et seq., in a manner that assists
in the maintenance or recovery of those species;
(iii) manage elk, deer, and antelope populations based on habitat estimates determined as
provided in 87-1-322 and maintain elk, deer, and antelope population numbers at or below population estimates
as provided in 87-1-323. In implementing an elk management plan, the department shall, as necessary to
achieve harvest and population objectives, request that land management agencies open public lands and
public roads to public access during the big game hunting season.
(iv) in accordance with the forest management plan required by 87-1-622, address fire mitigation,
pine beetle infestation, and wildlife habitat enhancement giving priority to forested lands in excess of 50
contiguous acres in any state park, fishing access site, or wildlife management area under the department's
jurisdiction.
(b) In maintaining or recovering a listed species, a sensitive species, or a species that is a potential
candidate for listing, the department shall seek, to the fullest extent possible, to balance maintenance or
recovery of those species with the social and economic impacts of species maintenance or recovery.
(c) Any management plan developed by the department pursuant to this subsection (10) is subject
to the requirements of Title 75, chapter 1, part 1.
(d) This subsection (10) does not affect the ownership or possession, as authorized under law, of
a privately held listed species, a sensitive species, or a species that is a potential candidate for listing.
(11) The department shall publish an annual game count, estimating to the department's best ability
the numbers of each species of game animal, as defined in 87-2-101, in the hunting districts and administrative
regions of the state. In preparing the publication, the department may incorporate field observations, hunter
reporting statistics, or any other suitable method of determining game numbers. The publication must include
an explanation of the basis used in determining the game count.
(12) The department shall report current sage grouse population numbers, including the number of
leks, to the Montana sage grouse oversight team, established in 2-15-243, and the environmental quality
council in accordance with 5-11-210 on an annual basis. The report must include seasonal and historic
population data available from the department or any other source.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
(13) The department may not regulate the use or possession of firearms, firearm accessories, or
ammunition, including the chemical elements of ammunition used for hunting. This does not prevent:
(a) the restriction of certain hunting seasons to the use of specified hunting arms, such as the
establishment of special archery seasons and the special muzzleloader heritage hunting season established in
87-1-304;
(b) for human safety, the restriction of certain areas to the use of only specified hunting arms,
including bows and arrows, traditional handguns, and muzzleloading rifles;
(c) the restriction of the use of shotguns for the hunting of deer and elk pursuant to 87-6-401(1)(f);
(d) the regulation of migratory game bird hunting pursuant to 87-3-403; or
(e) the restriction of the use of rifles for bird hunting pursuant to 87-6-401(1)(g) or (1)(h).
(14) The department shall publish an annual public report that shows the number of licenses sold to
nonresidents in the previous license year for each species in which the purchase of a license or permit is
required. The report must also show how many licenses were issued through opportunities or programs for
nonresidents, such as those for the following:
(a) youths;
(b) college students;
(c) nonresidents who were former residents;
(d) nonresident licenses purchased by utilizing an outfitter preference point;
(e) sponsorships by a landowner, family member, or current Montana resident; or
(f) any other license opportunity or program for nonresidents.
(15) Except for mountain sheep as provided in 87-3-315, the department shall promulgate rules
relative to managing the collecting and possessing of naturally shed antlers and horns or the antlers or horns of
a game animal with a skull or a portion of a skull attached that has died from natural causes and that has not
been unlawfully killed, captured, or taken or accidentally killed."

Section 4. Section 87-1-304, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-1-304. Fixing of seasons and bag and possession limits. (1) Subject to the provisions of 87-5-
302 and subsections (7) through (9) (10) of this section, the commission may:
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
(a) fix seasons, bag limits, possession limits, and season limits;
(b) open or close or shorten or lengthen seasons on any species of game, bird, fish, or fur-bearing
animal as defined by 87-2-101;
(c) declare areas open to the hunting of deer, antelope, elk, moose, sheep, goat, mountain lion,
bear, wild buffalo or bison, and wolf by persons holding an archery stamp and the required license, permit, or
tag and designate times when only bows and arrows may be used to hunt deer, antelope, elk, moose, sheep,
goat, mountain lion, bear, wild buffalo or bison, and wolf in those areas;
(d) subject to the provisions of 87-1-301(6), restrict areas and species to hunting with only
specified hunting arms, including bow and arrow, for the reasons of safety or of providing diverse hunting
opportunities and experiences; and
(e) declare areas open to special license holders only and issue special licenses in a limited
number when the commission determines, after proper investigation, that a special season is necessary to
ensure the maintenance of an adequate supply of game birds, fish, or animals or fur-bearing animals. The
commission may declare a special season and issue special licenses when game birds, animals, or fur-bearing
animals are causing damage to private property or when a written complaint of damage has been filed with the
commission by the owner of that property. In determining to whom special licenses must be issued, the
commission may, when more applications are received than the number of animals to be killed, award permits
to those chosen under a drawing system. The procedures used for awarding the permits from the drawing
system must be determined by the commission.
(2) The commission may adopt rules governing the use of livestock and vehicles by archers during
special archery seasons.
(3) Subject to the provisions of 87-5-302 and subsection (7) of this section, the commission may
divide the state into fish and game districts and create fish, game, or fur-bearing animal districts throughout the
state. The commission may declare a closed season for hunting, fishing, or trapping in any of those districts
and later may open those districts to hunting, fishing, or trapping.
(4) The commission may declare a closed season on any species of game, fish, game birds, or fur-
bearing animals threatened with undue depletion from any cause. The commission may close any area or
district of any stream, public lake, or public water or portions thereof to hunting, trapping, or fishing for limited
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
periods of time when necessary to protect a recently stocked area, district, water, spawning waters, spawn-
taking waters, or spawn-taking stations or to prevent the undue depletion of fish, game, fur-bearing animals,
game birds, and nongame birds. The commission may open the area or district upon consent of a majority of
the property owners affected.
(5) The commission may authorize the director to open or close any special season upon 12 hours'
notice to the public.
(6) The commission may declare certain fishing waters closed to fishing except by persons under
15 years of age. The purpose of this subsection is to provide suitable fishing waters for the exclusive use and
enjoyment of juveniles under 15 years of age, at times and in areas the commission in its discretion considers
advisable and consistent with its policies relating to fishing.
(7) In an area immediately adjacent to a national park, the commission may not:
(a) prohibit the hunting or trapping of wolves; or
(b) close the area to wolf hunting or trapping unless a wolf harvest quota established by the
commission for that area has been met.
(8) The commission may authorize a wolf trapping season that opens the first Monday after
Thanksgiving and closes March 15 of the following calendar year, except that the commission may adjust the
dates for specific wolf management units based on regional recommendations.
(9) There is established a special muzzleloader heritage hunting season that begins on the second
Saturday after the end of the regular season and lasts 9 days. During this season, subject to the provisions of
87-6-401(1)(i) and rules adopted by the commission, a person may take a deer or elk with a valid license or
permit using plain lead projectiles and a muzzleloading rifle that is charged with loose black powder, loose
pyrodex, or an equivalent loose black powder substitute and ignited by a flintlock, wheel lock, matchlock, or
percussion mechanism using a percussion or musket cap. The muzzleloading rifle must be a minimum of 45
caliber and may not have more than two barrels.
(10) For an area controlled by the department that has date restrictions for its use, the commission
shall allow a resident, as defined in 87-2-102, with a license, as described in [section 1], access to the area 8
days in advance of a nonresident with a license, as described in [section 2], for the collecting of naturally shed
antlers and horns of elk, deer, and antelope or the antlers or horns of a game animal, except for mountain
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
sheep as provided in 87-3-315, with a skull or a portion of a skull attached that has died from natural causes
and that has not been unlawfully killed, captured, or taken or accidentally killed."

Section 5. Section 87-2-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-101. Definitions. As used in Title 87, chapter 3, and this chapter, unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Angling" or "fishing" means to take or harvest fish or the act of a person possessing any
instrument, article, or substance for the purpose of taking or harvesting fish in any location that a fish might
inhabit.
(2) (a) "Bait" means any animal matter, vegetable matter, or natural or artificial scent placed in an
area inhabited by wildlife for the purpose of attracting game animals or game birds.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) decoys, silhouettes, or other replicas of wildlife body forms;
(ii) scents used only to mask human odor; or
(iii) types of scents that are approved by the commission for attracting game animals or game
birds.
(3) "Fur-bearing animals" means marten or sable, otter, muskrat, fisher, mink, bobcat, lynx,
wolverine, northern swift fox, and beaver.
(4) "Game animals" means deer, elk, moose, antelope, caribou, mountain sheep, mountain goat,
mountain lion, bear, and wild buffalo.
(5) "Game fish" means all species of the family Salmonidae (chars, trout, salmon, grayling, and
whitefish); all species of the genus Sander (sandpike or sauger and walleyed pike or yellowpike perch); all
species of the genus Esox (northern pike, pickerel, and muskellunge); all species of the genus Micropterus
(bass); all species of the genus Polyodon (paddlefish); all species of the family Acipenseridae (sturgeon); all
species of the genus Lota (burbot or ling); the species Perca flavescens (yellow perch); all species of the genus
Pomoxis (crappie); and the species Ictalurus punctatus (channel catfish).
(6) "Hunt" means to pursue, shoot, wound, take, harvest, kill, chase, lure, possess, or capture or
the act of a person possessing a weapon, as defined in 45-2-101, or using a dog or a bird of prey for the
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
purpose of shooting, wounding, taking, harvesting, killing, possessing, or capturing wildlife protected by the
laws of this state in any location that wildlife may inhabit, whether or not the wildlife is then or subsequently
taken. The term includes an attempt to take or harvest by any means, including but not limited to pursuing,
shooting, wounding, killing, chasing, luring, possessing, or capturing.
(7) "Migratory game birds" means waterfowl, including wild ducks, wild geese, brant, and swans;
cranes, including little brown and sandhill; rails, including coots; Wilson's snipes or jacksnipes; and mourning
doves.
(8) "Nongame wildlife" means any wild mammal, bird, amphibian, reptile, fish, mollusk, crustacean,
or other animal not otherwise legally classified by statute or regulation of this state.
(9) "Open season" means the time during which game birds, game fish, game animals, and fur-
bearing animals may be lawfully taken.
(10) "Person" means an individual, association, partnership, or corporation.
(11) "Predatory animals" means coyote, weasel, skunk, and civet cat.
(12) "Shed" means a naturally shed antler or horn of elk, deer, or antelope.
(12)(13)"Trap" means to take or harvest or participate in the taking or harvesting of any wildlife
protected by the laws of the state by setting or placing any mechanical device, snare, deadfall, pit, or device
intended to take wildlife or to remove wildlife from any of these devices.
(13)(14)"Upland game birds" means sharp-tailed grouse, blue grouse, spruce (Franklin) grouse, prairie
chicken, sage hen or sage grouse, ruffed grouse, ring-necked pheasant, Hungarian partridge, ptarmigan, wild
turkey, and chukar partridge.
(14)(15)"Wild buffalo or bison" or "wild buffalo" means a bison that:
(a) has not been reduced to captivity;
(b) has never been subject to the per capita fee under 15-24-921;
(c) has never been owned by a person; and
(d) is not the offspring of a bison that has been subject to the per capita fee under 15-24-921."

Section 6. Section 87-2-106, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-106. Application for license. (1) A license may be procured from the director, a warden, or an
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
authorized agent of the director. The applicant shall state the applicant's name, age, [last four digits of the
applicant's social security number,] street address of permanent residence, mailing address, qualifying length of
time as a resident in the state of Montana, and status as a citizen of the United States or as an alien and other
facts, data, or descriptions as may be required by the department. An applicant for a resident license shall
present a valid Montana driver's license, Montana driver's examiner's identification card, tribal identification
card, or other identification specified by the department to substantiate the required information. It is the
applicant's burden to provide documentation establishing the applicant's identity and qualifications to purchase
a license. Except as provided in subsections (2) through (4), the statements made by the applicant must be
subscribed to by the applicant.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3), department employees or officers may issue licenses by
telephone, by mail, on the internet, or by other electronic means.
(3) To apply for a license under the provisions of 87-2-102(7), the applicant shall apply to the
director and shall subscribe to fulfillment of the requirements of 87-2-102(7). The director shall process the
application in an expedient manner.
(4) A resident may apply for and purchase a conservation license, hunting license, or fishing
license, or shed collecting license for the resident's spouse, parent, child, brother, or sister who is otherwise
qualified to obtain the license.
(5) A license is void unless subscribed to by the licensee.
(6) A person whose privilege to hunt, fish, or trap has been revoked is not eligible to purchase any
license until all terms of the court sentence in which the privilege was revoked, including making restitution,
have been met or the person is in compliance with installment payments specified by the court and the
department has received notification from the sentencing court to that effect pursuant to 87-6-922(2).
[(7) The department shall keep the applicant's social security number confidential, except that the
number may be provided to the department of public health and human services for use in administering Title
IV-D of the Social Security Act.]
(8) The department shall delete an applicant's social security number in any electronic database [5
years after the date that application is made for the most recent license]. (Bracketed language terminates or is
amended on occurrence of contingency--sec. 3, Ch. 321, L. 2001.)"
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1

Section 7. Section 87-2-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-201. Conservation license required and prerequisite for other licenses. (1) Except as
provided in 87-2-803(6) and 87-2-815, it is unlawful for any person to engage in any of the following without first
having purchased a conservation license as provided in this part:
(a) purchase or apply for a hunting, fishing, shed collecting, or trapping license;
(b) use lands owned or controlled by the department; or
(c) engage in general recreational use as defined in 77-1-101 on state trust land pursuant to an
agreement established under 77-1-815.
(2) If the department of natural resources and conservation and the department enter into an
agreement pursuant to 77-1-815, the department shall submit every other legislative session a report to the
legislature in accordance with 5-11-210 that documents the number of conservation licenses sold and revenue
received pursuant to this section. The first report shall must be provided to the legislature by January 1, 2027."

Section 8. Section 87-2-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-202. Application -- fee. (1) Except as provided in 87-2-817(2), a conservation license must be
sold upon written application. The application must contain the applicant's name, age, [last four digits of the
applicant's social security number,] street address of permanent residence, mailing address, qualifying length of
time as a resident in the state of Montana, and status as a citizen of the United States or as an alien and must
be signed by the applicant. The applicant shall present a valid Montana driver's license, a Montana driver's
examiner's identification card, a tribal identification card, or other identification specified by the department to
substantiate the required information when applying for a conservation license. It is the applicant's burden to
provide documentation establishing the applicant's identity and qualifications to purchase a conservation
license or to receive a free conservation license pursuant to 87-2-817(2).
(2) Hunting, fishing, shed collecting, or trapping licenses issued in a form determined by the
department must be recorded according to rules that the department may prescribe.
(3) (a) Resident conservation licenses may be purchased for a fee of $8, of which 25 cents is a
voluntary search and rescue donation.
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
(b) Nonresident conservation licenses may be purchased for a fee of $10, of which 25 cents is a
voluntary search and rescue donation.
(c) A person who purchases a conservation license may make a written election not to pay the
additional search and rescue donation in subsections (3)(a) and (3)(b). If a written election is made, the
donation may not be collected.
[(4) The department shall keep the applicant's social security number confidential, except that the
number may be provided to the department of public health and human services for use in administering Title
IV-D of the Social Security Act.]
(5) The department shall delete the applicant's social security number in any electronic database
[5 years after the date that application is made for the most recent license]. (Bracketed language terminates or
is amended on occurrence of contingency--sec. 3, Ch. 321, L. 2001. The $2 conservation license fee increases
in subsections (3)(a) and (3)(b) enacted by Ch. 596, L. 2003, are void on occurrence of contingency--sec. 8,
Ch. 596, L. 2003.)"

Section 9. Section 87-6-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-6-202. Unlawful possession, shipping, or transportation of game fish, bird, game animal, or
fur-bearing animal. (1) A person may not possess, ship, or transport all or part of any game fish, bird, game
animal, or fur-bearing animal that was unlawfully killed, captured, or taken, whether killed, captured, or taken in
Montana or outside of Montana.
(2) This section does not prohibit the possession, shipping, or transportation of:
(a) hides, heads, or mounts of lawfully killed, captured, or taken game fish, birds, game animals, or
fur-bearing animals, except that the sale or purchase of a hide, head, or mount of a grizzly bear is prohibited,
except as provided by federal law;
(b) naturally shed antlers or the antlers with a skull or portion of a skull attached from a game
animal that has died from natural causes and that has not been unlawfully killed, captured, collected, or taken
or accidentally killed;
(c) the bones of an elk, antelope, moose, or deer that has died from natural causes and that has
not been unlawfully killed, captured, or taken or accidentally killed;
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
(d) paddlefish roe as caviar under the provisions of 87-4-601;
(e) captive-reared migratory waterfowl; or
(f) salvaged antelope, deer, elk, or moose subject to 87-3-145.
(3) A person may not possess, ship, or transport live fish away from the body of water in which the
fish were taken except:
(a) as provided in Title 87, chapter 4, part 6, or as specifically permitted by the laws of this state;
(b) fish species approved by the commission for use as live bait and subject to any restrictions
imposed by the commission; or
(c) within the boundaries of the eastern Montana fishing district, as established by commission
regulations.
(4) Except as provided in 87-3-310, possession of all or part of a dead game fish, bird, game
animal, or fur-bearing animal is prima facie evidence that the person or persons in whose possession the fish,
bird, or animal is found killed, captured, or took the fish, bird, or animal.
(5) The value of a game fish, bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal that is unlawfully possessed,
shipped, or transported must be determined from the schedules of restitution values in 87-6-906 and 87-6-907.
The value of game fish, birds, game animals, or fur-bearing animals that are unlawfully possessed, shipped, or
transported pursuant to a common scheme, as defined in 45-2-101, or as part of the same transaction, as
defined in 46-1-202, may be aggregated in determining the value.
(6) The following penalties apply for a violation of this section:
(a) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with unlawful possession,
shipping, or transportation of a game fish or bird and if the value of all or part of the game fish or bird or
combination thereof does not exceed $1,000, the person shall be fined not less than $50 or more than $1,000
or be imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the person
may be subject to forfeiture of any current hunting, fishing, or trapping license issued by this state and the
privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state or to use state lands, as defined in 77-1-101, for recreational purposes
for a period of time set by the court.
(b) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with unlawful possession or
transportation of a mountain sheep, moose, wild buffalo, caribou, mountain goat, black bear, or grizzly bear or
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
any part of these animals and if the value of all or part of the animal or combination thereof does not exceed
$1,000, the person shall be fined not less than $500 or more than $2,000 or be imprisoned in the county
detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the person shall forfeit any current hunting,
fishing, recreational use, or trapping license issued by this state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this
state for 30 months from the date of conviction or forfeiture unless the court imposes a longer period.
(c) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with unlawful possession or
transportation of a deer, antelope, elk, or mountain lion or any part of these animals and if the value of all or
part of the animal or combination thereof does not exceed $1,000, the person shall be fined not less than $300
or more than $1,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In
addition, the person shall forfeit any current hunting, fishing, or trapping license issued by this state and the
privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state for 24 months from the date of conviction or forfeiture unless the court
imposes a longer period.
(d) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with unlawful shipping of a
mountain sheep, moose, wild buffalo, caribou, mountain goat, black bear, grizzly bear, deer, antelope, elk, or
mountain lion or any part of these animals and if the value of all or part of the animal or combination thereof
does not exceed $1,000, the person shall be fined not less than $50 or more than $1,000 or be imprisoned in
the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the person may be subject to
forfeiture of any current hunting, fishing, or trapping license issued by this state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or
trap in this state or to use state lands, as defined in 77-1-101, for recreational purposes for a period of time set
by the court.
(e) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with unlawful possession,
shipping, or transportation of a fur-bearing animal or pelt of a fur-bearing animal and if the value of all or part of
the animal or combination thereof does not exceed $1,000, the person shall be fined not less than $100 or
more than $1,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In
addition, the person shall forfeit any current hunting, fishing, or trapping license issued by this state and the
privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state for 24 months from the date of conviction or forfeiture unless the court
imposes a longer period, and any pelts possessed unlawfully must be confiscated.
(f) If a person is convicted under this section or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with a
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
violation of this section and if the value of all or part of the game fish, bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal
or combination thereof exceeds $1,000, the person shall be fined not more than $50,000 or be imprisoned in
the state prison for a term not to exceed 5 years, or both. In addition, the person shall forfeit any current
hunting, fishing, or trapping license or permit issued by this state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this
state for not less than 3 years up to a revocation for life from the date of conviction.
(7) A person convicted of unlawful possession of more than double the legal bag limit may be
subject to the additional penalties provided in 87-6-901.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "lawfully killed, captured, or taken" means killed, captured, or taken in conformance with this
title, the regulations adopted by the commission, and the rules adopted by the department under authority of
this title;
(b) "possess" includes the act of killing, capturing, or taking a game fish, bird, game animal, or fur-
bearing animal regardless of whether the person takes or retains physical possession of the fish, bird, or
animal; and
(c) "unlawfully killed, captured, collected, or taken" means not lawfully killed, captured, collected,
or taken.
(9) A violation of this section may also result in an order to pay restitution pursuant to 87-6-905
through 87-6-907."

Section 10. Section 87-6-206, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-6-206. Unlawful sale of game fish, bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal. (1) A person
may not purposely or knowingly sell, purchase, or exchange all or part of any game fish, bird, game animal, or
fur-bearing animal.
(2) The value of the game fish, bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal must be determined from
the schedules of restitution values set out in 87-6-906 and 87-6-907. The value of game fish, birds, game
animals, or fur-bearing animals that are sold, purchased, or exchanged pursuant to a common scheme, as
defined in 45-2-101, or as part of the same transaction, as defined in 46-1-202, may be aggregated in
determining the value.
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
(3) This section does not prohibit the:
(a) sale, purchase, or exchange of hides, heads, or mounts of game fish, birds, game animals, or
fur-bearing animals that have been lawfully killed, captured, or taken, except that the sale or purchase of a hide,
head, or mount of a grizzly bear is prohibited, except as provided by federal law;
(b) sale, purchase, or exchange of naturally shed antlers or the antlers with a skull or portion of a
skull attached from a game animal that has died from natural causes and that has not been unlawfully killed,
captured, collected, or taken or accidentally killed;
(c) sale, purchase, or exchange of the bones of an elk, antelope, moose, or deer that has died
from natural causes and that has not been unlawfully killed, captured, or taken or accidentally killed;
(d) donation, sale, purchase, or exchange of paddlefish roe as caviar under the provisions of 87-4-
601; or
(e) sale, purchase, or exchange of captive-reared migratory waterfowl.
(4) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with a violation of this
section and if the value of all or part of the game fish, bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal or combination
thereof does not exceed $1,000, then the person shall be fined not less than $50 or more than $1,000 or be
imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the person may be
subject to forfeiture of any current hunting, fishing, or trapping license or permit issued by this state and the
privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state for a period set by the court.
(5) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with a violation of this
section and if the value of all or part of the game fish, bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal or combination
thereof exceeds $1,000, then the person shall be fined not more than $50,000 or be imprisoned in the state
prison for not more than 5 years, or both. In addition, the person shall forfeit any current hunting, fishing, or
trapping license or permit issued by this state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state for not less than
3 years up to a revocation for life from the date of conviction.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "lawfully killed, captured, collected, or taken" means killed, captured, collected, or taken in
conformance with this title, the regulations adopted by the commission, and the rules adopted by the
department under authority of this title; and
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 353.1
(b) "unlawfully killed, captured, or taken" means not lawfully killed, captured, or taken."

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified
as an integral part of Title 87, chapter 2, part 5, and the provisions of Title 87, chapter 2, part 5, apply to
[sections 1 and 2].
- END -
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – HB 353